Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.760

Waiver applications annual report.

Beginning September 1, 2019, the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report to the state board of education and education committees of the house of representatives and the senate summaries of all waiver applications submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for the prior school year under RCW 28A.150.222, 28A.150.290, 28A.230.015, and 28A.300.750, including the following information for each type of waiver:

(1) The annual number of waiver applications the superintendent approved and did not approve;

(2) A brief summary of each waiver request;

(3) The reasons the superintendent approved or did not approve each waiver application; and

(4) Links to the waiver applications posted on the superintendent's website.

[ 2018 c 177 s 508.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.